Indiana, session 2026, HB1032.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-3-2-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b), congressional districts shall be established by law at
the first regular session of the general assembly convening immediately
following the United States decennial census.
(b) The general assembly may amend the congressional districts
established under subsection (a) at a time other than the first
regular session of the general assembly convening immediately
following the United States decennial census.
SECTION 2. IC 3-3-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.133-2021,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) This subsection applies only to the first
regular session of the one hundred twenty-second general assembly. If
the general assembly adjourns sine die before November 15, 2021,
without having complied with the requirements of section 1 of this
chapter, a redistricting commission is established. The redistricting
commission consists of the speaker of the house, the president pro tem
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


of the senate, the chairpersons of the senate and house committees
responsible for legislative apportionment, and a fifth member
appointed by the governor from the membership of the general
assembly.
(b) (a) This subsection applies to a session of the general assembly
beginning after November 15, 2021. If a session of the general
assembly adjourns without having complied with the requirements of
section 1 1(a) of this chapter or if for any other reason at any time the
state finds itself without a valid congressional district law, a
redistricting commission shall be established which shall consist of the
speaker of the house, the president pro tem of the senate, the chairman
of the senate and house committees responsible for legislative
apportionment and a fifth member who shall be appointed by the
governor from the membership of the general assembly.
(c) (b) The redistricting commission shall meet within thirty (30)
days after adjournment of the general assembly at a time and place
designated by the president pro tem of the senate and shall adopt a
congressional redistricting plan in accordance with this chapter.
(d) (c) Any plan so adopted shall be signed by a majority of the
redistricting committee and submitted to the governor who forthwith
shall issue and publish the governor's executive order establishing
congressional districts in accordance with the plan so adopted and
directing the commission to place such congressional districts in effect
for the primary and general elections next succeeding such general
assembly. Congressional districts so established shall continue in effect
until changed by statute.
SECTION 3. IC 3-3-2-3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) This section applies to any action
challenging the apportionment of congressional districts or general
assembly districts.
(b) The general assembly makes the following findings with
respect to actions to which this section applies:
(1) The state has a compelling interest in preserving the
integrity of its elections and ensuring elections are fair,
orderly, and free from chaos and confusion.
(2) Actions challenging the apportionment of congressional or
general assembly districts can have statewide impacts on the
electoral process and disrupt the orderly conduct of elections.
(3) Judicial alterations to election laws can interfere with the
orderly administration of an election, cause unanticipated
consequences, and undermine voter confidence in the electoral
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


process.
(4) A prompt, orderly determination of apportionment issues
by a court of last resort is critical for preserving election
integrity, protecting voter confidence, and preventing chaotic
disruption of the electoral process.
(c) The following apply in any action to which this section
applies:
(1) A temporary restraining order may not be sought or
issued.
(2) The supreme court has mandatory and exclusive
jurisdiction over any appeal from an order granting,
extending, modifying, or refusing to dissolve an injunction.
However, this subdivision does not apply to an appeal from an
order refusing to grant or dissolving an injunction.
(3) The supreme court has mandatory and exclusive
jurisdiction over any appeal from a final judgment or any
other appealable order holding the apportionment
unconstitutional or otherwise invalid, either in whole or in
part.
(4) If an appeal is taken from an order, injunction, or
judgment concerning the apportionment of congressional
districts or general assembly districts, the order, injunction,
or judgment is automatically stayed by operation of law
pending disposition of the appeal by the supreme court. Any
party may seek relief from the stay in the supreme court, and
relief from the stay may be sought only in the supreme court.
(5) Any action or appeal of an action to which this section
applies must be given priority over ordinary matters.
SECTION 4. IC 3-3-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.221-2021,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "district" refers to
a district described in:
(1) IC 3-3-5, before November 8, 2022; and
(2) (1) IC 3-3-6, after November 7, 2022. before November 3,
2026; and
(2) IC 3-3-7, after November 2, 2026.
SECTION 5. IC 3-3-4-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.221-2021,
SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. (a) Any part of Indiana that has not been
described as included in a district is included within the district that:
(1) is contiguous to the part; and
(2) contains the least population of districts contiguous to that
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


part according to the 2020 decennial census of Indiana.
(b) If any part of Indiana is described as being in more than one (1)
district, the part is included within the district that:
(1) is one (1) of the districts in which the part is listed in:
(A) IC 3-3-5, before November 8, 2022; and
(B) (A) IC 3-3-6, after November 7, 2022; before November
3, 2026; and
(B) IC 3-3-7, after November 2, 2026;
whichever is applicable;
(2) is contiguous to the part; and
(3) contains the least population according to the 2020 decennial
census of Indiana.
(c) If any part of Indiana:
(1) is described in:
(A) IC 3-3-5, before November 8, 2022; and
(B) (A) IC 3-3-6, after November 7, 2022; before November
3, 2026; and
(B) IC 3-3-7, after November 2, 2026;
as being in one (1) district; and
(2) is entirely surrounded by another district;
the part shall be incorporated into the district that surrounds the part.
(d) If any part of Indiana:
(1) is described as being in one (1) district; and
(2) is not contiguous to another part of the district that contains
the majority of the population in the district;
the part is included with the contiguous district that contains the least
population according to the 2020 decennial census of Indiana.
SECTION 6. IC 3-3-6-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 10. This chapter expires November 3, 2026.
SECTION 7. IC 3-3-7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]:
Chapter 7. Congressional Districts; 2026 Plan
Sec. 1. The First Congressional District consists of the following:
COUNTIES:
Cass County, Fulton County, Lake County, Marshall County,
Miami County, Pulaski County, Starke County, Wabash
County
LaPorte County TOWNSHIPS:
Cass Township, Dewey Township, Hanna Township, Prairie
Township
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


Porter County TOWNSHIPS:
Boone Township, Morgan Township, Pleasant Township,
Porter Township, Union Township
Porter County PRECINCTS:
CENTER 18, CENTER 23, CENTER 24, CENTER 31,
CENTER 32
Porter County CENSUS BLOCKS:
181270506053001, 181270506053002, 181270506053003,
181270506053004, 181270506062000, 181270506062001,
181270506062002, 181270506062003, 181270506062004,
181270506062005, 181270506063000, 181270506063001,
181270506063002, 181270506063003, 181270506063004,
181270506063005, 181270506063006, 181270506063007,
181270506063008, 181270506063009, 181270506063010,
181270506063011, 181270506063012, 181270506063013,
181270506063014, 181270506063015, 181270506063017,
181270506063020, 181270506063022, 181270506063023,
181270506063024, 181270506063025, 181270506063026,
181270506063027, 181270506063028, 181270506063029,
181270506063030, 181270506063031, 181270506063032,
181270506063033, 181270509011013, 181270509011014,
181270509011015, 181270509011016, 181270509011017,
181270509011018, 181270509011019, 181270509011020,
181270509011021, 181270509011022, 181270509011023,
181270509011024, 181270509011025, 181270509011026,
181270509011027, 181270509011032, 181270509011033,
181270509011034, 181270509011035, 181270509012010,
181270509012011, 181270509012012, 181270509012013,
181270509012014, 181270509012015, 181270509012016
Sec. 2. The Second Congressional District consists of the
following:
COUNTIES:
Kosciusko County, Noble County, St. Joseph County, Whitley
County
Elkhart County TOWNSHIPS:
Baugo Township, Benton Township, Cleveland Township,
Harrison Township, Jackson Township, Locke Township,
Olive Township, Osolo Township, Union Township
Elkhart County PRECINCTS:
WASHINGTON 02
Elkhart County CENSUS BLOCKS:
180390007011000, 180390007011001, 180390007011002,
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


180390007012000, 180390007012001, 180390007012002,
180390007012003, 180390007012004, 180390007012005,
180390007012006, 180390007012007, 180390007012008,
180390007012009, 180390007012010, 180390007012011,
180390007012015, 180390007012016, 180390007012017,
180390007012018, 180390007012019, 180390007012020,
180390007012021, 180390007012022, 180390007012023,
180390007012024, 180390007012025, 180390007012026,
180390007012027, 180390007012028, 180390007013000,
180390007013001, 180390007013002, 180390007013003,
180390007013004, 180390007013005, 180390007013006,
180390007013007, 180390007013008, 180390007013009,
180390007013010, 180390007013011, 180390007013012,
180390007013013, 180390007013014, 180390007013015,
180390007013016, 180390007013017, 180390007013018,
180390007022007, 180390007022024, 180390007022025,
180390007022026, 180390007022027, 180390007022028,
180390007022029, 180390007022030, 180390007022031,
180390007022032, 180390007022033, 180390007022034,
180390007022037, 180390007022038, 180390007022039,
180390007022040, 180390007022041, 180390007022042,
180390007022043, 180390007022044, 180390007022045,
180390007022046, 180390007022047, 180390007022054,
180390007022055, 180390007022059, 180390007023009,
180390007023010, 180390007023013, 180390007023014,
180390007023023
LaPorte County TOWNSHIPS:
Center Township, Clinton Township, Coolspring Township,
Galena Township, Hudson Township, Johnson Township,
Kankakee Township, Lincoln Township, Michigan Township,
New Durham Township, Noble Township, Pleasant Township,
Scipio Township, Springfield Township, Union Township,
Washington Township, Wills Township
Porter County TOWNSHIPS:
Jackson Township, Liberty Township, Pine Township,
Portage Township, Washington Township, Westchester
Township
Porter County PRECINCTS:
CENTER 01, CENTER 02, CENTER 03, CENTER 05,
CENTER 06, CENTER 07, CENTER 09, CENTER 11,
CENTER 13, CENTER 14, CENTER 15, CENTER 17,
CENTER 20, CENTER 21, CENTER 22, CENTER 25,
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


CENTER 26, CENTER 27, CENTER 28, CENTER 29,
CENTER 30, CENTER 33, CENTER 34, CENTER 35, LAKE
MICHIGAN NV
Porter County CENSUS BLOCKS:
181270506051008, 181270506051011, 181270506051012,
181270506051013, 181270506051020, 181270506051021,
181270506051022, 181270506051023, 181270506051024,
181270506051025, 181270506051026, 181270506051027,
181270506051045, 181270506051048, 181270506063018,
181270506063021, 181270507041037, 181270507041038,
181270507041039, 181270507041040, 181270507041041,
181270507041042, 181270507041043, 181270507041044,
181270507041045, 181270507041047, 181270507041048,
181270508011049, 181270509012017, 181270509012021
Sec. 3. The Third Congressional District consists of the
following:
COUNTIES:
Adams County, Allen County, DeKalb County, Jay County,
LaGrange County, Steuben County
Delaware County TOWNSHIPS:
Delaware Township, Liberty Township, Niles Township
Delaware County PRECINCTS:
PRECINCT 01, PRECINCT 02, PRECINCT 03, PRECINCT
04, PRECINCT 06, PRECINCT 07, PRECINCT 08,
PRECINCT 10, PRECINCT 11, PRECINCT 12, PRECINCT
13, PRECINCT 14, PRECINCT 15, PRECINCT 18,
PRECINCT 19, PRECINCT 20, PRECINCT 22, PRECINCT
23, PRECINCT 25, PRECINCT 26, PRECINCT 27,
PRECINCT 33, PRECINCT 34, PRECINCT 35, PRECINCT
36, PRECINCT 38, PRECINCT 39, PRECINCT 40,
PRECINCT 42, PRECINCT 43, PRECINCT 45, PRECINCT
46, PRECINCT 47, PRECINCT 48, PRECINCT 49,
PRECINCT 50
Delaware County CENSUS BLOCKS:
180350013001025, 180350013001027, 180350013001028,
180350013001029, 180350013001030, 180350013001031,
180350013001032, 180350013001034, 180350013002001,
180350013002002, 180350013002003, 180350013002004,
180350013002005, 180350013002006, 180350013002007,
180350013002011, 180350013002012, 180350013002013,
180350013002014, 180350013002015, 180350013002016,
180350013002017, 180350013003019, 180350013003020,
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


180350013003021, 180350013003022, 180350013003023,
180350013003024, 180350013003025, 180350013003026,
180350013003027, 180350013003028, 180350013003029,
180350014001000, 180350014001007, 180350015003008,
180350015003009, 180350015003010, 180350015004012,
180350015004013, 180350015004014, 180350015004015,
180350015004016, 180350015004017, 180350015004018,
180350015004019, 180350015004020, 180350015004021,
180350015004022, 180350015004023, 180350016001026,
180350016001027, 180350016001028, 180350016001029,
180350016001030, 180350016001031, 180350016001032,
180350021001000, 180350021001001, 180350021001002,
180350021001003, 180350021001004, 180350021001005,
180350021001006, 180350021001007, 180350021001008,
180350021001009
Elkhart County TOWNSHIPS:
Clinton Township, Concord Township, Elkhart Township,
Jefferson Township, Middlebury Township, York Township
Elkhart County CENSUS BLOCKS:
180390007021000, 180390007021001, 180390007021002,
180390007021003, 180390007021004, 180390007021005,
180390007021006, 180390007021007, 180390007021008,
180390007021009, 180390007021010, 180390007021011,
180390007021012, 180390007021013, 180390007021014,
180390007021015, 180390007021016, 180390007021017,
180390007021018, 180390007021019, 180390007021020,
180390007021021, 180390007021022, 180390007021023,
180390007021024, 180390007021025, 180390007021026,
180390007021027, 180390007021028, 180390007021029,
180390007021030, 180390007021031, 180390007021032,
180390007021033, 180390007021034, 180390007021035,
180390007022000, 180390007022001, 180390007022002,
180390007022003, 180390007022004, 180390007022005,
180390007022006, 180390007022008, 180390007022009,
180390007022010, 180390007022011, 180390007022012,
180390007022013, 180390007022014, 180390007022015,
180390007022016, 180390007022017, 180390007022018,
180390007022019, 180390007022020, 180390007022021,
180390007022022, 180390007022023, 180390007022048,
180390007022049, 180390007022050, 180390007022051,
180390007022052, 180390007022053, 180390007022056,
180390007022057, 180390007022058, 180390007023000,
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


180390007023001, 180390007023002, 180390007023003,
180390007023004, 180390007023005, 180390007023006,
180390007023007, 180390007023008, 180390007023015,
180390007023016, 180390007023017, 180390007023018,
180390007023019, 180390007023020, 180390007023021,
180390007023022, 180390007023024, 180390007023025,
180390007023026, 180390007023027, 180390007023028
Sec. 4. The Fourth Congressional District consists of the
following:
COUNTIES:
Benton County, Boone County, Clay County, Fountain
County, Hendricks County, Jasper County, Montgomery
County, Newton County, Owen County, Parke County,
Putnam County, Vermillion County, Warren County, White
County
Greene County TOWNSHIPS:
Fairplay Township, Grant Township, Highland Township,
Jefferson Township, Smith Township, Stafford Township,
Stockton Township, Washington Township, Wright Township
Greene County PRECINCTS:
RICHLAND 1, RICHLAND 2
Greene County CENSUS BLOCKS:
180559554004002, 180559554004003, 180559554004004,
180559554004005, 180559554004006, 180559554004007,
180559554004008, 180559554004009, 180559554004010,
180559554004011, 180559554004012, 180559554004013,
180559554004015, 180559554004016, 180559554004017,
180559554004018, 180559554004019, 180559554004020,
180559554004025, 180559554004026, 180559554004031,
180559554004032, 180559554004036, 180559554004039,
180559554004040
Marion County TOWNSHIPS:
Pike Township
Marion County PRECINCTS:
WS-01, WS-02, WS-03, WS-04, WS-05, WS-06, WS-07,
WS-08, WS-09, WS-10, WS-11, WS-12, WS-13, WS-14,
WS-15, WS-16, WS-17, WS-18, WS-19, WS-20, WS-21,
WS-22, WS-23, WS-24, WS-25, WS-26, WS-27, WS-28,
WS-29, WS-31, WS-32, WS-33, WS-34, WS-35, WS-36,
WS-37, WS-38, WS-40, WS-41, WS-43, WY-01, WY-11,
WY-12, WY-13, WY-22
Marion County CENSUS BLOCKS:
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


180973202021007, 180973202021008, 180973202021009,
180973202021013, 180973202021014, 180973202021015,
180973202021019, 180973202021020, 180973202021021,
180973202021022, 180973202021023, 180973202021024,
180973202021025, 180973202021026, 180973202021027,
180973202021028, 180973202021029, 180973205001010,
180973205002017, 180973206001014, 180973206001018,
180973206001019, 180973206001020, 180973206001021,
180973206001022, 180973206001023, 180973206001024,
180973206001025, 180973206001026, 180973206001027,
180973206002002, 180973206002003, 180973206002004,
180973206002005, 180973206002006, 180973206002007,
180973206002017, 180973206002018, 180973206002019,
180973206002041, 180973206002044, 180973206002045,
180973206002047, 180973207001005, 180973207001007,
180973207001025, 180973208002022, 180973209022003,
180973209022004, 180973209022005, 180973209022006,
180973209023000, 180973209023001, 180973209023002,
180973209023003, 180973209023004, 180973209023005,
180973401112008, 180973401112009, 180973401112011,
180973401112012, 180973401112013, 180973401121000,
180973401121001, 180973401121002, 180973401121003,
180973401121009, 180973401121010, 180973401121011,
180973401121012, 180973401124005, 180973401124012,
180973401131004, 180973401131006, 180973401131007,
180973401131008, 180973401131010, 180973401131012,
180973401131013, 180973401131014, 180973401133000,
180973401133001, 180973401133002, 180973401133003,
180973401133004, 180973401143013, 180973401152015,
180973401152016, 180973401152018
Tippecanoe County TOWNSHIPS:
Jackson Township, Lauramie Township, Randolph Township,
Sheffield Township, Shelby Township, Union Township,
Wayne Township, Wea Township
Tippecanoe County PRECINCTS:
WABASH 01, WABASH 02, WABASH 03, WABASH 04,
WABASH 05, WABASH 08, WABASH 09, WABASH 10,
WABASH 11, WABASH 12, WABASH 13, WABASH 18,
WABASH 19, WABASH 20, WABASH 31
Tippecanoe County CENSUS BLOCKS:
181570051012000, 181570051021008, 181570051021014,
181570051021015, 181570051022003, 181570051022004,
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


181570051022005, 181570051022010, 181570055001025,
181570102071042, 181570102071043, 181570102071053,
181570102071054, 181570105001008, 181570105001009,
181570105001010, 181570105001011, 181570106001006,
181570106001007, 181570106001008, 181570106001009,
181570106001010, 181570106001011, 181570106001012,
181570106001013, 181570106001014, 181570106001015,
181570106001016, 181570106001017, 181570106001018,
181570106001019, 181570106001020, 181570106001021,
181570106001022, 181570106001023, 181570106001024,
181570106001025, 181570106001026, 181570106001027,
181570106001028, 181570106001029, 181570106001030,
181570106001031, 181570106001032, 181570106001033,
181570106001034, 181570106001035, 181570106001036,
181570106001037, 181570106001038, 181570106001039,
181570106001040, 181570106001041, 181570106001042,
181570106001043, 181570106001044, 181570106001045,
181570106001046, 181570106001048, 181570106001049,
181570106001050, 181570106001051, 181570106001052,
181570106001053
Sec. 5. The Fifth Congressional District consists of the following:
COUNTIES:
Blackford County, Carroll County, Clinton County, Grant
County, Hamilton County, Howard County, Huntington
County, Tipton County, Wells County
Tippecanoe County TOWNSHIPS:
Fairfield Township, Perry Township, Tippecanoe Township,
Washington Township
Tippecanoe County PRECINCTS:
WABASH 06, WABASH 14, WABASH 17, WABASH 21,
WABASH 22, WABASH 23, WABASH 24, WABASH 25,
WABASH 26, WABASH 27
Tippecanoe County CENSUS BLOCKS:
181570051012013, 181570051012014, 181570051012018,
181570051021000, 181570051021016, 181570051021017,
181570051021018, 181570051022000, 181570051022001,
181570051022002, 181570051022006, 181570051022007,
181570051022008, 181570051022009, 181570051022011,
181570051022012, 181570051022013, 181570051022014,
181570051022015, 181570051022016, 181570051022017,
181570051022018, 181570051022019, 181570051022021,
181570051022026, 181570051022031, 181570051023004,
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


181570051023005, 181570052001008, 181570052001009,
181570052001010, 181570052002000, 181570052002001,
181570052002003, 181570052002004, 181570052003000,
181570052003001, 181570052003002, 181570052003003,
181570052003004, 181570052003005, 181570052003006,
181570054012003, 181570054012006, 181570054012023,
181570054012024, 181570054012025, 181570054022012,
181570054022013, 181570054022014, 181570054022017,
181570054022019, 181570055001000, 181570055001001,
181570055001002, 181570055001003, 181570055001004,
181570055001005, 181570055001006, 181570055001007,
181570055001008, 181570055001009, 181570055001010,
181570055001011, 181570055001012, 181570055001013,
181570055001014, 181570055001015, 181570055001016,
181570055001017, 181570055001018, 181570055001019,
181570055001020, 181570055001021, 181570055001022,
181570055001023, 181570055001024, 181570055002000,
181570055002001, 181570055002002, 181570055002003,
181570055003000, 181570055003001, 181570055003002,
181570055004000, 181570055004001, 181570055004002,
181570055004003, 181570055004004, 181570055004005,
181570102071058, 181570105001000, 181570105001001,
181570105001002, 181570105001003, 181570105001004,
181570105001005, 181570105001006, 181570105001007,
181570105002000, 181570106001000, 181570106001001,
181570106001002, 181570106001003, 181570106001004,
181570106001005, 181570106001047
Sec. 6. The Sixth Congressional District consists of the
following:
COUNTIES:
Bartholomew County, Decatur County, Fayette County,
Jennings County, Johnson County, Rush County, Shelby
County
Marion County TOWNSHIPS:
Franklin Township, Perry Township, Warren Township
Marion County PRECINCTS:
02-02, 02-03, 02-04, 09-01, 09-02, 09-03, 09-04, 09-05, 09-06,
09-07, 10-03, 10-04, 10-05, 13-01, 13-02, 13-03, 13-04, 13-05,
15-01, 15-02, 16-01, 16-02, 16-03, 16-04, 16-05, 17-01, 17-02,
17-03, 17-04, 17-05, 25-01, 25-02, 25-03, 25-04, 25-05, 30-01,
30-02, 30-03, 30-04, 30-05, 30-06, 30-07, WR-34, CO-01,
CO-02
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


Marion County CENSUS BLOCKS:
180973521002019, 180973521002020, 180973521002025,
180973521002026, 180973521003017, 180973526002000,
180973526002001, 180973526002002, 180973526002003,
180973526002004, 180973526002005, 180973526002006,
180973527001000, 180973527001001, 180973527001002,
180973527001003, 180973527001004, 180973527001007,
180973527001008, 180973527001009, 180973527001010,
180973527001011, 180973527001016, 180973527001017,
180973527001018, 180973527001019, 180973527001024,
180973527001025, 180973527001026, 180973527001027,
180973527001046, 180973527003000, 180973527003001,
180973527003002, 180973527003013, 180973527003014,
180973527003015, 180973527003016, 180973527003019,
180973528001040, 180973528001041, 180973528001067,
180973528001068, 180973545001002, 180973545001003,
180973545001006, 180973545001007, 180973545001008,
180973545001009, 180973545002002, 180973545002003,
180973545002005, 180973545002006, 180973545003003,
180973545003004, 180973545003009, 180973545003010,
180973545003011, 180973545003012, 180973545003013,
180973545003014
Sec. 7. The Seventh Congressional District consists of the
following:
COUNTIES:
Dearborn County, Franklin County, Hancock County, Henry
County, Jefferson County, Madison County, Ohio County,
Randolph County, Ripley County, Switzerland County, Union
County, Wayne County
Delaware County TOWNSHIPS:
Hamilton Township, Harrison Township, Monroe Township,
Perry Township, Salem Township, Union Township,
Washington Township
Delaware County PRECINCTS:
PRECINCT 05, PRECINCT 29, PRECINCT 44, PRECINCT
53, PRECINCT 54, PRECINCT 55, PRECINCT 71,
PRECINCT 74, PRECINCT 81, PRECINCT 87, PRECINCT
88, PRECINCT 95, PRECINCT 98
Delaware County CENSUS BLOCKS:
180350013002000, 180350013002008, 180350013002009,
180350013002010, 180350013002018, 180350015004024,
180350015004025, 180350015004026, 180350015004027,
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


180350015004028, 180350015004029, 180350015004030,
180350016001025, 180350016001033, 180350016001034,
180350016001035, 180350016001036, 180350016001037,
180350016001038, 180350017001020, 180350017001021,
180350017001022, 180350021001010, 180350021001011,
180350021001013, 180350021001014, 180350021001015,
180350021001016, 180350021001017, 180350021001018,
180350021001024, 180350021001025, 180350021001029,
180350021001030, 180350021001031, 180350021001032,
180350021001033, 180350021001034, 180350021001035,
180350021001036, 180350021001037, 180350021001038,
180350021001039, 180350021001040, 180350021001041,
180350021001042, 180350021001043, 180350021001046,
180350021001048, 180350021001049, 180350021001050,
180350021001051, 180350021001053, 180350021001054,
180350021001055, 180350021001056, 180350021001057,
180350021001058, 180350021001059, 180350021001061,
180350021001062, 180350021001063, 180350021001064,
180350021001065, 180350021001066, 180350021001067,
180350021002002, 180350021002013, 180350021002015,
180350021002016, 180350021002017, 180350021002018
Marion County PRECINCTS:
20-01, 20-02, 20-03, 20-04, 20-05, 20-06, 20-07, 20-08, 20-09,
20-10, 20-11, 20-12, 21-03, 21-04, 21-05, 21-07, 21-08, 21-09,
21-10, 21-11, 21-12, 21-13, 22-01, 22-02, 22-03, 22-04, 22-05,
22-06, 22-07, 22-08, 27-01, 27-02, 27-03, 27-04, 27-05, 27-06,
27-07, 27-08, 27-09, 27-10, 27-11, 27-12, 27-13, 27-14, 31-01,
31-02, 31-03, 31-04, LA-01, LA-02, LA-03, LA-04, LA-05,
LA-06, LA-07, LA-08, LA-09, LA-10, LA-11, LA-12, LA-13,
LA-14, LA-15, LA-16, LA-17, LA-18, LA-19, LA-20, LA-21,
LA-22, LA-23, LA-24, LA-25, LA-26, LA-27, LA-28, LA-29,
LA-30, LA-31, LA-32, LA-33, LA-34, LA-35, LA-36, LA-37,
LA-38, LA-39, LA-40, LA-41, LA-42, LA-43, LA-44, LA-45,
LA-46, LA-47, LA-48, LA-49, LA-50, LA-51, LA-52, LA-53,
LA-54, LA-55, LA-56, LA-57, LA-58, LA-59, LA-60, LA-61,
LA-62, LA-63, LA-64, LA-65, LA-66, LA-67, WS-39, WS-45,
WS-46, WS-47, WS-48, WS-49, WS-50, WS-51, WS-52,
WS-53, WS-54, WS-55, WS-56, WS-57, WS-58, WS-59,
WS-60, WS-61, WS-62, WS-63, WS-64, WS-65, WS-66,
WS-67, WS-68, WS-69
Marion County CENSUS BLOCKS:
180973205001009, 180973205001011, 180973205001012,
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


180973205001013, 180973205001014, 180973205001015,
180973205001016, 180973205001017, 180973205001018,
180973205001019, 180973205001020, 180973205002005,
180973205002006, 180973205002007, 180973205002009,
180973205002010, 180973205002011, 180973205002014,
180973207001000, 180973207001001, 180973207001002,
180973207001003, 180973207001004, 180973207001006,
180973207001008, 180973207001009, 180973207001010,
180973207001011, 180973207001012, 180973207001013,
180973207001014, 180973207001015, 180973207001016,
180973207001017, 180973207001018, 180973207001019,
180973207001020, 180973207001021, 180973207001022,
180973207001023, 180973207001024, 180973207001026,
180973207001027, 180973207001028, 180973207001029,
180973207001030, 180973207001031, 180973207001032,
180973207001033, 180973207001034, 180973207001035,
180973207001036, 180973207001037, 180973207001038,
180973207001039, 180973207001040, 180973207001041,
180973207001042, 180973207001043, 180973207001044,
180973207001045, 180973207001046, 180973207001047,
180973207001048, 180973207001049, 180973207001050,
180973207001051, 180973207001052, 180973207001053,
180973207001054, 180973207001055, 180973207001056,
180973207001057, 180973207001058, 180973207001059,
180973207001060, 180973207001061, 180973207001062,
180973207001063, 180973207001064, 180973207001065,
180973207001066, 180973207001067, 180973207001068,
180973207001069, 180973207001070, 180973207001071,
180973207001072, 180973207001073, 180973209034000,
180973211001000, 180973211001001, 180973212001000,
180973212001001, 180973212001002, 180973212001003,
180973212001004, 180973212001005, 180973212001006,
180973212001007, 180973212001011, 180973212001019,
180973212001020, 180973212001021, 180973212001022,
180973212001023, 180973212001024, 180973212001025,
180973212001026, 180973212001027, 180973212001028,
180973212001029, 180973212001037, 180973213002000,
180973213002001, 180973213002002, 180973213002003,
180973213002004, 180973213002005, 180973213002006,
180973213002007, 180973213002008, 180973213002009,
180973213002010, 180973213002011, 180973213002012,
180973213002013, 180973213002014, 180973213002015,
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


180973213002016, 180973213002017, 180973213002018,
180973213002019, 180973213002020, 180973213002021,
180973214004016, 180973214004017, 180973214004018
Sec. 8. The Eighth Congressional District consists of the
following:
COUNTIES:
Daviess County, Dubois County, Gibson County, Knox
County, Martin County, Monroe County, Perry County, Pike
County, Posey County, Spencer County, Sullivan County,
Vanderburgh County, Vigo County, Warrick County
Greene County TOWNSHIPS:
Beech Creek Township, Cass Township, Center Township,
Jackson Township, Taylor Township
Greene County PRECINCTS:
RICHLAND 4
Greene County CENSUS BLOCKS:
180559553001016, 180559553001017, 180559553001018,
180559553001019, 180559553001020, 180559553001021,
180559554001040, 180559554001041, 180559554001042,
180559554001043, 180559554001046, 180559554001047,
180559554001048, 180559554001049, 180559554001051,
180559554001052, 180559554001053, 180559554001054,
180559554001055, 180559554003018, 180559554003019,
180559554003021, 180559554003022, 180559554003023,
180559554003024, 180559554004000, 180559554004001,
180559554004014, 180559554004021, 180559554004022,
180559554004023, 180559554004024, 180559554004027,
180559554004028, 180559554004029, 180559554004030,
180559554004033, 180559554004034, 180559554004035,
180559554004037, 180559554004038, 180559554004041,
180559554004042, 180559554004043
Sec. 9. The Ninth Congressional District consists of the
following:
COUNTIES:
Brown County, Clark County, Crawford County, Floyd
County, Harrison County, Jackson County, Lawrence
County, Morgan County, Orange County, Scott County,
Washington County
Marion County TOWNSHIPS:
Decatur Township
Marion County PRECINCTS:
01-01, 01-02, 01-03, 01-04, 01-05, 01-06, 01-07, 01-08, 01-10,
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


03-01, 03-02, 03-03, 03-04, 03-05, 04-01, 04-02, 04-03, 04-04,
04-05, 05-01, 05-02, 05-03, 05-04, 05-05, 05-06, 06-01, 06-02,
06-03, 06-04, 06-05, 06-06, 07-01, 07-02, 07-03, 08-01, 08-02,
08-03, 11-01, 11-02, 11-03, 11-04, 11-05, 12-01, 12-02, 12-03,
14-01, 14-02, 19-01, 19-02, 19-03, 19-04, 19-05, 19-06, 23-01,
23-02, 23-03, 23-04, 23-05, 23-06, 23-08, 24-01, 24-02, 24-03,
24-04, 24-05, 29-01, 29-02, 29-03, 29-04, 29-05, 29-06, 29-07,
29-08, 29-09, 29-10, 29-11, 29-12, 29-13, 29-14, 29-15, 29-16,
29-17, 29-18, WY-03, WY-04, WY-05, WY-06, WY-07,
WY-08, WY-09, WY-10, WY-14, WY-15, WY-17, WY-18,
WY-19, WY-20, WY-21, WY-23, WY-24, WY-25, WY-26,
WY-27, WY-28, WY-29, WY-30, WY-31, WY-32, WY-33,
WY-34, WY-35, WY-36, WY-37, WY-38, WY-39, WY-40,
WY-41, WY-42, WY-43, WY-44, WY-45, WY-46, WY-47,
WY-48, WY-49, WY-50, WY-51, WY-52, WY-53, WY-54,
WY-55, WY-56, WY-57, WY-58, WY-59, WY-60
Marion County CENSUS BLOCKS:
180973401111004, 180973401124001, 180973401131000,
180973401131001, 180973401131002, 180973401131003,
180973401131005, 180973401131009, 180973401131011,
180973519002009, 180973519002010, 180973519002011,
180973519002015, 180973519002016, 180973519002017,
180973519003010, 180973519003011, 180973519003012,
180973519003013, 180973519003014, 180973519003015,
180973519003016, 180973519003017, 180973519003018,
180973519003019, 180973521001001, 180973521001002,
180973521001003, 180973521001004, 180973521001005,
180973521001010, 180973521001011, 180973521001012,
180973521001013, 180973521002001, 180973521002002,
180973521002003, 180973521002007, 180973521002008,
180973521002009, 180973521002010, 180973521002011,
180973521002012, 180973521002013, 180973521002014,
180973521002015, 180973521002017, 180973521002018,
180973521002021, 180973521002022, 180973521002023,
180973521002024, 180973521003016, 180973527001020,
180973527001021, 180973527001022, 180973527001023,
180973527001043, 180973527001044, 180973527001048,
180973527001049, 180973527001050, 180973527003003,
180973527003004, 180973527003005, 180973527003006,
180973527003007, 180973527003008, 180973527003009,
180973527003010, 180973527003011, 180973527003012,
180973527003017, 180973527003018, 180973527003020,
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


180973527003021, 180973527003022, 180973528001000,
180973528001001, 180973528001002, 180973528001003,
180973528001004, 180973528001005, 180973528001006,
180973528001007, 180973528001008, 180973528001009,
180973528001010, 180973528001011, 180973528001014,
180973528001015, 180973528001016, 180973528001019,
180973528001020, 180973528001021, 180973528001022,
180973528001023, 180973528001024, 180973528001029,
180973528001030, 180973528001031, 180973528001032,
180973528001033, 180973528001034, 180973528001035,
180973528001036, 180973528001037, 180973528001038,
180973528001039, 180973528001042, 180973528001043,
180973528001044, 180973528001045, 180973528001046,
180973528001047, 180973528001048, 180973528001062,
180973528001063, 180973528001064, 180973528001065,
180973528001066, 180973528001069, 180973528001070,
180973528001071, 180973528001072, 180973528001081,
180973544001000, 180973544001001, 180973544001002,
180973544001003, 180973544001004, 180973544001005,
180973544001006, 180973544001007, 180973544001008,
180973544001009, 180973544001010, 180973544001011,
180973544001012, 180973544001015, 180973544001016,
180973544001017, 180973544001018, 180973544001019,
180973544001020, 180973544001021, 180973544001022,
180973544001023, 180973544001024, 180973544001025,
180973544001026, 180973544001027, 180973544001028,
180973544001029, 180973544001030, 180973544001031,
180973544001032, 180973544001033, 180973544001034,
180973544001035, 180973544001040, 180973544002000,
180973544002001, 180973544002002, 180973544002009,
180973544002010, 180973544002011, 180973544002012,
180973544002013, 180973544002014, 180973544002015,
180973544002016, 180973544002020, 180973544002021,
180973544002022, 180973544002023, 180973545001004,
180973545001005, 180973545001010, 180973545001011,
180973545002004, 180973545003005, 180973545003006,
180973545003007, 180973545003008, 180973545003015,
180973545003016, 180973545003017, 180973545003018,
180973545003019, 180973545003020, 180973545003021,
180973545003022, 180973545003023
SECTION 8. IC 3-11-1.5-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4. (a) A county
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


executive shall establish precincts so that each boundary of each
precinct does not cross the boundary of:
(1) the state;
(2) a county;
(3) a township;
(4) a district of the House of Representatives of the Congress of
the United States;
(5) a district of the senate of the general assembly; or
(6) a district of the house of representatives of the general
assembly.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), for purposes of the 2026
primary and general election, a precinct may cross the boundary
of a district of the House of Representatives of the Congress of the
United States. This subsection expires November 4, 2026.
SECTION 9. IC 3-11-1.5-20.5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 20.5. (a) This
section applies when:
(1) a county executive is advised that a proposed precinct
establishment order does not comply with this chapter; and
(2) the county executive determines that the noncompliance
cannot be corrected by the establishment of a precinct that
complies with both:
(A) the maximum voter requirement of section 3 of this
chapter; and
(B) the precinct boundary requirements of section 5 of this
chapter.
(b) The county executive may request the commission to grant an
exemption from the precinct boundary requirements of section 5 of this
chapter to establish a precinct boundary described by this section.
(c) The commission shall conduct a hearing on the exemption
request. If the commission determines that the noncompliance cannot
be corrected by the establishment of a precinct that complies with both:
(1) the maximum voter requirement of section 3 of this chapter;
and
(2) the precinct boundary requirements of section 5 of this
chapter;
the commission shall grant the exemption. However, the commission
may not grant an exemption that violates section 4(1), 4(a)(1), 4(a)(4),
4(5), 4(a)(5), 4(6), or (4)(a)(6) 4(7) of this chapter.
(d) If the commission grants the exemption, the county executive
shall amend the proposed precinct establishment order described by
section 19 of this chapter to establish precinct boundaries:
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


(1) in accordance with the exemption granted by the commission;
and
(2) that comply with all other requirements established by this
chapter.
(e) The proposed precinct establishment order described in
subsection (d) must include a description in metes and bounds of the
boundaries authorized by the exemption granted under this section.
SECTION 10. IC 3-11-1.5-35, AS AMENDED BY P.L.2-2005,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 35. (a) This section applies to a county that
has a precinct that crosses a boundary in violation of section 4(4),
4(a)(4), 4(5), 4(a)(5), or 4(6) 4(a)(6) of this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding section 25 of this chapter, if the county does
not issue a precinct establishment order that establishes precincts in
compliance with section 4(4), 4(a)(4), 4(5), 4(a)(5), and 4(6) 4(a)(6)
of this chapter by the January 31 following the last effective date
described in section 25(2) of this chapter, the commission may issue an
order establishing precincts as provided under subsection (c).
(c) An order issued by the commission under this section must
comply with section 4(4), 4(a)(4), 4(5), 4(a)(5), and 4(6) 4(a)(6) of this
chapter.
(d) The co-directors shall send a copy of the commission's order to
the office.
SECTION 11. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) The definitions
in IC 3-5-2.1 apply throughout this SECTION.
(b) The election division shall assist each county voter
registration office with the implementation of this act.
(c) This SECTION expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 12. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) The districts
described by IC 3-3-7, as added by this act, apply to an election to
the office of United States Representative beginning with the
primary and general elections in 2026 for members of the 120th
Congress. This act does not affect the membership or the
congressional districts of the 119th Congress.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 13. An emergency is declared for this act.
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Elections and Apportionment, to
which was referred House Bill 1032, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the House with
the recommendation that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1032 as introduced.)
WESCO
Committee Vote: Yeas 8, Nays 5
_____
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Elections, to which was
referred House Bill No. 1032, has had the same under consideration
and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with the
recommendation that said bill DO PASS.
(Reference is to HB 1032 as printed December 2, 2025.)
GASKILL, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 6, Nays 3
EH 1032—LS 6390/DI 144